Maryland, session 2025, SB0895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–503.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “EMPLOYER” INCLUDES A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT.
(B) An employer may not make a deduction from the wage of an employee unless
the deduction is:
(1) ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0895*

SENATE BILL 895
(2) authorized expressly in writing by the employee;
(3) allowed by the Commissioner because the employee has received full
consideration for the deduction; [or]
(4) AUTHORIZED EXPRESSLY IN A COMPENSATION OR BENEFIT PLAN
FOR PUBLIC EMPLOYEES, SUCH AS A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN, ADOPTED
BY A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT; OR
[(4)] (5) otherwise made in accordance with any law or any rule or
regulation issued by a governmental unit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.